North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-35 Water Districts
61-35-26.4.
Water service agreement — Mediation — Administrative law judge.

If a water service agreement between the district and the city is not executed within sixty days after the city notifies the district that a city water service area plan has been developed, the matter must be submitted to a committee for mediation. The committee must be comprised of a mediator retained jointly by the city and the district, two members appointed by the governing body of the city, and two members appointed by the district. The retained mediator shall arrange and preside over the mediation proceedings.

If the mediation committee is unable to resolve the dispute to the satisfaction of the parties involved, either party may petition the office of administrative hearings to appoint an administrative law judge to determine the terms of the water service agreement. Before a hearing may be held, at least two weeks’ written notice must be given to the parties involved in the dispute. At the hearing, the retained mediator who presided over the mediation proceedings may provide information to the administrative law judge on the dispute between the parties involved and any proposed resolutions or recommendations made by a majority of the members appointed to the committee. Any resident of or person owning property in a city or district involved in the dispute, or a representative of such a resident or property owner, and any representative of a city or district involved, may appear at the hearing and present evidence on any matter to be determined by the administrative law judge. A decision by the administrative law judge must consider the following factors related to water service in the annexed area in making a decision under this subsection:

The recommendation of the mediation committee;

The firefighting flow capacity of the water system;

The anticipated growth patterns of the district and city involved in the dispute;

Special conditions or needs, including topographic or physical features influencing service;

The system capacity and trunk main delivery structure of each provider;

The age, condition, and worth of the affected existing infrastructure;

Outstanding debt attributable to current users;

The impact on future revenues lost from existing and future customers;

Whether development would have occurred without annexation; and

Any other factor determined to be relevant by the administrative law judge.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 488, § 4.

61-35-27.
Personal liability.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a director, officer, employee, or other personnel of the board are not liable for the district’s debts or obligations and a director, officer, employee, or volunteer of the board is not personally liable in that capacity for a claim based upon an act or omission of the person in the discharge of the person’s duties, except for any of the following:

A breach of the duty of loyalty to the district.

Acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or knowing violation of the law.

A transaction from which the person derives an improper personal benefit.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-28.
Proceedings to confirm contracts, special assessments, and other acts.

Any district board, before making any contract, levying special assessments, or issuing special assessment improvement bonds or revenue bonds, or before taking any special action, may commence a special proceeding in district court by which the proceeding leading up to the making of such contract, levying special assessments, issuing improvement bonds or revenue bonds, or leading up to any other special action, may be judicially examined, approved, and confirmed. Such judicial proceedings must substantially comply with the procedure required in the case of judicial confirmation of proceedings, acts, and contracts of an irrigation district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-29.
Authorization to organize association of rural water systems.

A district, upon resolution of the district board, may organize and participate in an association of rural water systems organized under chapter 10-33.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 1997, ch. 105, § 13.

61-35-30.
Resolution authorizing project and the issuance of revenue bonds.

The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any project and the issuance of bonds in anticipation of the collection of the revenues of such project to provide funds to pay the associated costs may be authorized by a resolution of the board adopted after appropriate notice by the affirmative vote of a majority of the board. The amount of such bonds may not exceed the amount authorized by the participating members of the district as provided in this chapter. Unless otherwise provided in the resolution, the resolution under this section takes effect immediately and need not be laid over, published, or posted.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-31.
Refunding bonds authorized by resolution — Adoption — Taking effect.

Refunding bonds must be authorized by resolution of the board. The resolution may be adopted at a regular or special meeting, including the meeting at which it is introduced, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board, and takes effect immediately upon adoption. Other proceedings or procedure are not required for the issuance of refunding bonds by the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-32.
Cost of project — How determined.

In determining the cost of a project, the board may include the estimated cost of bond issuance, all engineering, inspection, fiscal, and legal expenses, any bond reserves, and the estimated interest that will accrue during construction, and within six months after completion of construction.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-33.
Provisions governing bonds.

The resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds or refunding bonds under this chapter or resolutions adopted after the adoption of the original resolution must prescribe:

The rate or rates of interest, payable semiannually.

Whether the bonds will be in one or more series.

The date or dates the bonds will bear.

The time or times, not exceeding forty years from their respective dates, when the bonds will mature.

The medium in which the bonds will be payable.

The place or places where the bonds will be payable.

Whether or not the bonds will carry registration privileges and what those privileges, if any, will be.

The terms of redemption, if any, to which the bonds will be subject.

The manner in which the bonds will be executed.

The terms, covenants, and conditions that the bonds will contain.

The form in which the bonds will be issued.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-34.
Sale of bonds — When private sale authorized — Public sale and notice.

Revenue bonds or refunding bonds must be sold at not less than ninety-eight percent of par. The bonds may be sold at private sale without notice or at public sale after notice of the sale has been published once at least five days before the sale in a newspaper circulating in the district. Bonds sold at private sale must bear interest at a rate and be sold at a price resulting in an average net interest cost not exceeding twelve percent per annum. There is no interest rate ceiling on issues sold at public sale or to the state or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. As to any series or issue of bonds for which a notice of sale was published but for which no bids were received or all bids received were rejected, the board, without readvertising the bonds for sale, may negotiate the sale of all of the bonds to any person upon terms complying with those specified in the published notice of sale and, if bids were rejected, more favorable to the district than those specified in the rejected bid.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-35.
Bonds and receipts or certificates issued pending preparation of bonds — Negotiability.

Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, bond anticipation notes may be issued and sold in the form and with the provisions determined by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-36.
Validity of bonds.

Revenue bonds or refunding bonds bearing the signatures of the appropriate officers who are in office on the date of signing are valid and binding obligations notwithstanding that before the delivery and payment any or all of the persons whose signatures appear on the bonds have ceased to be officers of the issuing district. The validity of the bonds is not dependent upon or affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of the project for which the bonds are issued. The resolution authorizing the bonds may provide that the bonds must contain a recital that they are issued under this chapter and the recital is conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-37.
Bonds exempt from taxation.

Bonds issued under this chapter and their income are exempt from taxation by the state or by any political subdivision.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-38.
Covenants that may be inserted in resolution authorizing bonds.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter to completely or partially finance or refinance the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of a project may contain covenants that limit the exercise of powers conferred by this chapter as to:

The rates, fees, tolls, or charges to be charged for the services, facilities, and commodities of the project.

The use and disposition of the revenues of the project.

The creation, maintenance, regulation, use, and disposition of reserves or sinking funds.

The purpose to which the proceeds of the sale of bonds may be applied and the use and disposition of the proceeds.

The events of default and the rights and liabilities arising upon default and the terms and conditions upon which the holders of bonds issued under this chapter may bring any suit or action on said bonds.

The payment by the district to the account of the project of a fair and reasonable amount for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished the district or any of its departments by the project.

The issuance of other or additional bonds or instruments payable from or constituting a charge against the revenue of the project.

The insurance to be carried upon the project and the use and disposition of insurance moneys.

The keeping, inspection, and audit of books of account.

The terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds become or may be declared due before maturity and the terms and conditions upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived.

The rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by the district of any covenants, conditions, or obligations.

The vesting in a trustee of the right to enforce any covenants made to secure, to pay, or in relation to, the bonds, the powers and duties of such trustee, and the limitations of liabilities thereof.

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds, or the holders of any proportion or percentage of them, may enforce any covenants made or any duties imposed under this chapter.

A procedure by which the terms of any resolution authorizing bonds or of any other contract with bondholders, including an indenture of trust or similar instrument, may be amended or abrogated, and the amount of bonds that holders of which must consent to the resolution or contract, and the manner in which such consent may be given.

The subordination of the security of any bonds issued under this chapter and the payment of principal and interest on those bonds, to the extent deemed feasible and desirable by the governing body, to other bonds or obligations of the district issued to finance or refinance the project or that may be outstanding when the bonds thus subordinated are issued and delivered.

Nothing in this section authorizes any district to do anything in any manner or for any purpose which would result in the creation or incurring of a debt or indebtedness or the issuance of any instrument which would constitute a debt or indebtedness within the meaning of any provision, limitation, or restriction of the Constitution of North Dakota relating to the creation or incurring of a debt or indebtedness or the issuance of an instrument constituting a debt or indebtedness.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-39.
Liability of district for bonds — Taxing power prohibited — Bond not a lien.

Revenue and refunding bonds issued under this chapter may not be payable from or charged upon any funds other than the revenue pledged to their payment and the district issuing the bonds may not be subject to any pecuniary liability. The holder of any such bonds may not enforce payment of the bonds against any property of the district. Bonds issued under this chapter do not constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any property of the district. Each bond issued under this chapter must recite in substance that the bond, and interest on the bond, is payable solely from the revenue pledged to the payment and that the bond does not constitute a debt of the district within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-40.
Duties of district and officers.

To adequately secure the payment of bonds and interest on the bonds, any district issuing bonds under this chapter, and the district’s officers, agents, and employees shall:

Pay or cause to be paid punctually the principal and interest of every bond on the dates, at the places, in the manner, and out of the funds provided in the refunding bond and in accordance with the resolution authorizing its issuance.

Operate the project in an efficient and economical manner and establish, levy, maintain, and collect related necessary or proper fees, tolls, rentals, rates, and other charges. Such fees, tolls, rentals, rates, and other charges must be sufficient, after making due and reasonable allowances for contingencies and for a margin of error in the estimates, at least:

To pay all current expenses of operation and maintenance of the project;

To pay the interest and principal on the bonds as they become due;

To comply with the terms of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or any other contract or agreement with the holders of the refunding bonds; and

To meet any other obligations of the district which are charges, liens, or encumbrances upon the revenues of the project.

Operate, maintain, preserve, and keep every part of the project in good repair, working order, and condition.

Preserve and protect the security of the bonds and the rights of the bondholders and warrant and defend such rights against all claims and demands.

Pay and discharge all lawful claims for labor, materials, and supplies, which, if unpaid, might become by law a lien or charge upon the revenues, or any part of the revenues, superior to the lien of the bonds or which might impair the security of the bonds.

Hold in trust the revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds for the benefit of the holders of the bonds and apply the revenues only as provided by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, or, if the resolution is modified, as provided in the modified resolution.

Keep proper separate books of record and accounts of the project in which complete and correct entries must be made of all transactions relating to any part of the project. All books and papers of the district are subject to inspection by the holders of ten percent or more of the outstanding bonds or of their representatives authorized in writing.

None of the duties contained in this section require any expenditure by the district of any funds other than revenue received from the project. The performance of the duties enumerated in this section is of the essence of the contract of the district with the bondholders.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-41.
Remedies of bondholders in general.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue of bonds, or a trustee for the holders, including the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion or percentage of the holders, any holder of bonds or trustee, for the equal benefit and protection of all bondholders similarly situated, may:

By mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity, enforce the holder’s rights against the district and its board and any of its officers, agents, and employees and may require the district or the board or any officers, agents, or employees of the district or board to perform their duties and obligations under this chapter and their covenants and agreements with bondholders.

By action or suit in equity, require the district and the board to account as if they were the trustees of an express trust.

By action or suit in equity, enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the bondholders.

Bring suit upon the bond.

A right or remedy conferred by this chapter upon any bondholder, or upon any trustee for a bondholder, is not intended to be exclusive of any other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this chapter or by any other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-42.
Receiver of project — When appointed.

If the district defaults in the payment of the principal or interest on any of the bonds when due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and the default continues for a period of thirty days, or if the district or the board, or officers, agents, or employees of the district fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or default in any agreement made under this chapter, or default in any agreement made with the holders of the bonds, any bondholder, or the trustee for any bondholder, may apply to the district court of the county in which all or any part of the project is located for the appointment of a receiver of the project whether or not all of the bonds have been declared due and payable and whether or not the holder or trustee is seeking or has sought to enforce any other right or to exercise any other remedy in connection with the bonds. Upon such application, the court may appoint a receiver of the project. If the application is made by the holders of twenty-five percent in principal amount of the outstanding bonds, or by any trustee for holders of the bonds in that principal amount, the court shall appoint a receiver of the project.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-43.
Powers and duties of receiver of project.

A receiver appointed under section 61-35-42, directly or by agents and attorneys, shall immediately enter into and upon and take possession of the entire project and may exclude from the project the district, its board, officers, agents, and employees, and all persons claiming under them. The receiver shall have, hold, use, operate, manage, and control the entire project in the name of the district or otherwise as determined by the receiver. The receiver shall exercise all the rights and powers of the district with respect to the project. The receiver shall maintain the project and restore and keep it insured and make all repairs the receiver deems necessary, proper, or expedient. The receiver shall establish, levy, maintain, and collect such fees, tolls, rentals, and other charges in connection with the project as the receiver deems necessary, proper, and reasonable. The receiver shall collect all revenues, deposit them in a separate account, and apply them as the court directs.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-44.
Court may direct receiver to surrender possession of project.

After payment of all that is due upon the bonds and any other obligations that are a charge, lien, or encumbrance on the revenues of the project under any of the terms of any covenants or agreements with bondholders, and after all defaults have been made good, the court, after notice and hearing as it deems proper, may direct the receiver to surrender the possession of the project to the district. The holders of the bonds have the same right to secure the appointment of a receiver upon any subsequent default as is provided in this chapter in the case of an original default.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-45.
Receiver subject to jurisdiction of court — Jurisdiction of court.

A receiver under this chapter acts under the direction and supervision of the appointing court and is subject to the orders of that court and may be removed by it. This chapter does not limit the jurisdiction of the court to enter orders it deems necessary for the receiver to exercise any functions set forth in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-46.
Construction.

Powers under this chapter are in addition and supplemental to and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this chapter do not affect the powers conferred by, any other law. Bonds may be issued under this chapter without regard to any other laws of this state, except as provided in section 61-35-39. The project may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered, and extended, and bonds may be issued under this chapter for those purposes, notwithstanding that any other law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, and extension of a like project or for the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, debt, or other limitations or other provisions contained in any other law, including any requirement for any restriction or limitation on the incurring of indebtedness or the issuance of bonds. If this chapter is inconsistent with any other law of this state, the provisions of this chapter are controlling with reference to the issuance of bonds.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-47.
Limitations on authorizations contained in chapter — Effect of chapter on bonds issued before August 1, 1995.

Nothing in this chapter may be deemed in any way to:

Alter the terms of any agreements made with the holders of any outstanding notes, bonds, or other obligations of the district, before August 1, 1995;

Authorize the district to alter the terms of any such agreements, or to impair, or to authorize the district to impair, the rights and remedies of any creditors of the district; or

To authorize any district to do anything in any manner or for any purpose which would result in the creation or incurring of a debt or indebtedness or the issuance of any instrument that would constitute a debt or indebtedness within the meaning of any provision, limitation, or restriction of the Constitution of North Dakota relating to the creation or incurring of a debt or indebtedness or the issuance of an instrument constituting a debt or indebtedness.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-48.
Power of district to defray expense of improvements by special assessments.

Upon complying with this chapter, a district may defray the expense of any or all of the improvements by special assessments, including the construction of all or part of a water supply system or a sewerage system, or both, or any improvement, extension, or replacement of such systems, including the construction and erection of wells, intakes, pumping stations, settling basins, filtration plants, standpipes, water towers, reservoirs, water mains, sanitary and storm sewer mains and outlets, facilities for the treatment and disposal of sewage and other district, industrial, and domestic wastes, and all other appurtenances, contrivances, and structures used or useful for a complete water supply and sewerage system. In planning an improvement project, the board may include in the plans any and all items of work and materials which in its judgment are necessary or reasonably incidental to the completion of an improvement project of that type.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-49.
Waterworks and water mains — Acquisition of waterworks, sewage treatment and disposal plants, and sewer systems.

The provisions of this chapter relating to water mains and waterworks apply only to districts that own or contemplate owning a system of waterworks and water mains. In the purchase of a waterworks system or of a sewage treatment or disposal plant or of a system of sewers, either by eminent domain in accordance with chapter 32-15, or otherwise, a district may create improvement districts, direct the preparation of plans and specifications, adopt a resolution declaring the purchase of the facilities necessary, and take all other proceedings prescribed by this chapter which would be taken in case of the construction of such facilities by the district itself for the purpose of defraying the cost by special assessment of the benefited property. The benefited property may be specially assessed for the purchase of such facilities, either separately or as a part of a new system, the same as if the facilities were constructed entirely anew.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2007, ch. 293, § 45.

61-35-50.
Acquiring property for sewers, water mains, and water supply beyond district limits.

When it is necessary to conduct the sewage of a district or to acquire a supply of water beyond the district limits and to construct mains or aqueducts to conduct water or sewage to the district limits, the board by grant, purchase, or condemnation proceedings may acquire private property over which to construct the sewer, or upon and over which to establish facilities for obtaining and storing such water supply and aqueducts or mains for conducting water to the corporate limits. Public property may be acquired for those purposes by grant or purchase from the government or public corporation owning the property. The cost of acquiring such property and building such sewer or other facilities upon or over the property may be included in the cost of construction or acquisition of a district waterworks or sewerage system and in the district’s special assessments levied, or the entirety of such a project may be completed as an improvement to an existing waterworks or sewage system and special assessments may be levied for that purpose in accordance with the provisions of this title.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-51.
Condemnation of land and rights of way for special improvements — Taking of possession — Trial — Appeal — Vacation of judgment.

When property required to make any improvement authorized by this chapter is to be taken by condemnation proceedings, the court, upon request by resolution of the board of the district making the improvement, shall call a special term of court for the trial of the proceedings and may summon a jury for the trial. The proceedings must be instituted and prosecuted in accordance with chapter 32-15, except that when the interest sought to be acquired is a right of way for the laying of any main, pipe, ditch, canal, aqueduct, or flume for conducting water, storm water, or sewage, whether within or without the district, the district may make an offer to purchase the right of way and may deposit the amount of the offer with the clerk of the district court of the county in which the right of way is located, and may then take possession of the right of way. The offer must be made by resolution of the board of the district, and a copy of the resolution must be attached to the complaint filed with the clerk of court in accordance with section 32-15-18. The clerk shall immediately notify the owners of the land on which the right of way is located of the deposit by causing a notice to be appended to the summons when served and published in the proceedings as provided in the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, stating the amount deposited or agreed in the resolution to be deposited. The owner may then appeal to the court by filing an answer to the complaint in the manner provided in the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, and may have a jury trial, unless a jury is waived, to determine the damages. However, upon due proof of the service of the notice and summons and upon deposit of the aggregate sum agreed in the resolution, the court may without further notice make and enter an order determining the district to be entitled to take immediate possession of the right of way. If under laws of the United States proceedings for the acquisition of any right of way are required to be instituted in or removed to a federal court, the proceedings may be taken in that court in the same manner and with the same effect as provided in this section and the clerk of the district court of the county in which the right of way is located shall perform any and all of the duties set forth in this section, if the clerk is directed to do so by the federal court. The proceedings must be determined as speedily as practicable. An appeal from a judgment in the condemnation proceedings must be taken within sixty days after the entry of the judgment and appeal must be given preference by the supreme court over all other civil cases except election contests. No final judgment in the condemnation proceedings awarding damages to property used by a district for sewer or other purposes may be vacated or set aside if the district pays to the defendant, or into court for the defendant, the amount awarded in cash. The district may levy special assessments within the district to pay all or part of the judgment. To provide funds for the payment of the judgment or for the deposit of the amount offered for purchase of a right of way, the district may issue bonds on the fund of the improvement district as provided in section 61-35-84, in anticipation of the levy and collection of special assessments or revenues to be appropriated to the fund in accordance with this chapter. The bonds may be issued upon or after the commencement of the condemnation proceedings. Upon the failure of the district to make payment in accordance with this section, the judgment in the condemnation proceedings may be vacated.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-52.
Improvement districts to be created.

For an improvement project under section 61-35-48 and defraying the cost of the project by special assessments, a district may create water districts, sewer districts, and water and sewer districts, and may extend any such district when necessary. The appropriate special improvement district must be created by resolution. The district must be designated by a name appropriate to the type of improvement for which it is created and by a number distinguishing it from other improvement districts. Nothing in this chapter prevents a district from making and financing any improvement and levying special assessments for the improvement under any alternate procedure in this title. For examinations or surveys, the board or its employees, after written notice to each landowner, may enter upon any land on which the proposed project is located or any other lands necessary to gain access.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-53.
Size and form of improvement districts — Regulations governing.

Any improvement district created by a district may embrace two or more separate property areas. Each improvement district must be of such size and form as to include all properties which in the judgment of the board, after consultation with the engineer planning the improvement, will be benefited by the construction of the improvement project which is proposed to be made in or for the district, or by any portion of the project. A single district may be created for an improvement of the type specified in section 61-35-48, notwithstanding any lack of uniformity among the types, items, or quantities of work and materials to be used at particular locations throughout the improvement district. The jurisdiction of a district to make, finance, and assess the cost of any improvement project may not be impaired by any lack of commonness, unity, or singleness of the location, purpose, or character of the improvement, or by the fact that any one or more of the properties included in the improvement district is subsequently determined not to be benefited by the improvement, or by a particular portion of the improvement project, and is not assessed for that purpose. The board may omit from a water or sewer district properties within the district limits which are benefited by the improvement but do not abut upon a water or sewer main, without prejudice to the right and power of the district subsequently to assess such properties to the extent and the manner permitted by law. The board may by resolution enlarge an improvement district in which an improvement is proposed or under construction upon receipt of a petition signed by the owners of three-fourths of the area to be added to the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-54.
Engineer’s report required — Contents.

After a special improvement district has been created, the board, if it deems it necessary to make any of the improvements set out in section 61-35-48 in the manner provided in this chapter, shall direct the engineer for the district, or some other competent engineer, to prepare a report as to the general nature, purpose, and feasibility of the proposed improvement. The engineer shall prepare profiles, plans, and specifications of the proposed project and estimates of the total cost. The estimate of costs prepared by the engineer must include acquisition of right of way and must be in sufficient detail to allow the board to determine the probable share of the total costs that will be assessed against each of the affected landowners in the proposed assessment district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-55.
Approval of plans, specifications, and estimates.

After receiving the engineer’s report required by section 61-35-54, the board may direct the engineer to prepare detailed plans and specifications for construction of the improvement. The plans and specifications must be approved by a resolution of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-56.
District engineer to retain copy of plans, specifications, and estimates — Sale of copies.

The engineer acting for the district shall retain a copy of the plans, specifications, and estimates that have been prepared for any improvement. The engineer shall furnish copies at the request of any person at a reasonable cost.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-57.
Plans, specifications, and estimates filed in office of district.

The plans, specifications, and estimates prepared as directed under section 61-35-55 are the property of the district, must be filed in the district office, and must remain on file subject to inspection by any interested person.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-58.
Hearing — Notice — Contents.

Upon the filing of the engineer’s report provided for in section 61-35-54, and after satisfying the requirements of section 61-35-55, the district board shall fix a date and place for public hearing on the proposed project. The place of hearing must be in the vicinity of the proposed project and must be convenient and accessible for the majority of the landowners subject to assessment for the project or whose property is subject to condemnation for the proposed project. The board shall cause a complete list of the benefits and assessments to be made, setting forth each county, township, or city assessed in its corporate capacity as well as each lot, piece, or parcel of land assessed, the amount each is benefited by the improvement, and the amount assessed against each. At least ten days before the hearing, the board shall file with the county auditor of each county in which the project is or will be located the list showing the percentage assessment and approximate assessment in dollars against each parcel of land benefited by the proposed project. Notice of the filing must be included in the notice of hearing. Notices of the hearing must contain a copy of the resolution of the board as well as the time and place where the board will conduct the hearing. The notice of hearing must specify when and where votes concerning the proposed project may be filed and contain an assessment list showing the percentage assessment and approximate assessment in dollars against each parcel of land benefited by the proposed project. The board shall cause the notice of hearing to be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in newspapers of general circulation in the area in which the affected landowners reside and in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located. The date set for the hearing may not be fewer than twenty days after the mailing of the notice. A record of the hearing must be made by the board, including a list of affected landowners present in person or by agent, and the record must be preserved in the minutes of the meeting. Affected landowners and the governing body of any county, township, or city to be assessed must be informed at the hearing of the probable total cost of the project and their individual share of the cost and the portion of their property, if any, to be condemned for the project.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.